


Samuels ProductsHome















 

Your Source for Pharmacy Supplies Information and Online 
Ordering




 







Our NEW Website will be Open Soon!  Check back often to see SPECIALS
 






























			 





























 



 
 



 





		SAMUELS PRODUCTS
Your 
		Prescription Packaging Leader 
For over 100 
		years, Samuels Products has had one goal in mind; to provide the 
		pharmacists of America with a single source supplier for all of their 
		packaging needs. From Labels & Bags, to Prescription Blanks & File 
		Folders; we manufacture all of them under one roof. Whether youre 
		searching for Pharmacy Vials, Dispensing Equipment or other items for 
		your pharmacy operation; look no further than right here at our web 
		site.

 
 

LABELS 
		OF ALL TYPES
If you need a label, we can make it!
Were not 
		limited to just prescription labels. If you have an application 
		requiring a label, let our customer service department help you to meet 
		your specific need. 
 
CHECK 
		OUT OUR NEW PRODUCTS 
From cost 
		saving prescription vials to the latest innovations in dispensing technology, Samuels 
		Products has the tools that make it easy for our customers to stay ahead 
		of the competition. 



 











Copyright Samuels Products 2013




 







Boston Property Management & Development | Samuels & Associates










Skip to main content












Company
Properties
News
Contact
 



Search 





 

 














Explore








Search

















 


BACK TO TOP 







Company

Our Current Projects
Our Purpose
Our Capabilities
Our People
Our Careers
Our History
Our Community
 


 


Company









      Our Current Projects    




 Pierce Boston 
 
 
 Pierce Boston is proud to bring sophistication and dramatic architecture to The Fenway neighborhood, with soaring, panoramic views and walls of shimmering glass.
Inside, each Pierce residence is designed to a higher standard. Step into airy floor plans complemented by floor-to-ceiling windows, natural light and stunning skyline views. Every element within a Pierce residence is intentionally crafted to provide an unparalleled living experience, including hardwood floors, select stone and tile accents and superior appliances.
Owners can take full advantage of exclusive amenities, sky cabanas, a swimming pool and roof deck. Needless to say, living here has its privileges.
Condo sales begin in May. 
 Learn more about Pierce Boston  

 Van Ness 
 




 
 Located at 1325 Bolyston St. in Boston, Van Ness epitomizes what it means to live, work and play in the new Fenway. Smart, dynamic and luxurious, the Van Ness complex is actually two buildings joined by ground-floor retail. The 172 luxury apartments are all well appointed, with the sleek amenities contemporary city dwellers have come to expect — open floor plans, stainless steel appliances and large common areas.
The Van Ness community features unique retail and restaurant opportunities. Target is paving the way, catering to the high-traffic of The Fenway and its eclectic residents. Craft Beer Sellers recently opened it's doors in April, and Bostonian Barber is coming soon later this summer.
Retail spaces are now leasing.
  
 Learn more about Van Ness  

 Continuum 
 


 
 Built on the border of Harvard University’s southern campus and the vibrant neighborhood of North Allston, Continuum is convenient and comfortable luxury living at its best. Not only is the location surrounded by green space (Continuum is bordered by Smithfield Park and a short walk from the Charles River), but it’s also steps from public transportation and less than a mile from the Mass Pike.
Featuring unique retail and restaurant opportunities, Continuum is adding some flavor to the diverse North Allston neighborhood with Our Father’s Deli coming later in 2016. Dave DuBois, the owner, is hoping to bring back a piece of Boston that he remembers from childhood with deli food, an outdoor patio and full bar. 
Retail spaces are now leasing. 
 Learn more about Continuum  

 



      Our Purpose    




More than just property developers, we forge meaningful partnerships with neighborhoods and clients. These relationships foster a sense of transparency that helps us create authentic, innovative and sustainable places to live, work and play.We believe that people should be able to live, work, shop and play in dynamic communities that inspire and enrich all aspects of their lives. 





      Our Capabilities    




Development
Development is our core capability and one that has evolved harmoniously with the firm. To us, development is about much more than creating new spaces — it’s about creating new communities that, through organic growth, become something more than they were. More livable. More shoppable. More accessible.
Committed to developing solutions that forge long-lasting, positive relationships, we are absolutely aware of the importance of maintaining a sense of respect, deal after deal, project after project.
For development inquiries, contact Sarah Scheffel at 617-603-5473
Leasing
Guided by creativity, our new urban and lifestyle projects take an inspired approach to leasing and merchandising. They deftly mix residential alongside (or above) retail with high-quality restaurant and entertainment components. We strive to reach a productive and exciting balance between strong national and local retailers, and restaurateurs.
Perfect for businesses looking for flexible and inspiring spaces to call home, our office leasing options can accommodate workforces (and aspirations) of nearly any size.
For retail leasing inquiries, contact Sabrina Sandberg, VP of Marketing & Merchandising at ssandberg@samuelsre.com or 617 603 5429
For office leasing inquiries, contact Peter Sougarides at 617 603 5426
For residential leasing inquiries, visit the specific property site. 
Property Management
Our asset and property management team manages all day-to-day operations, contract administration, lease administration coordination and planning aspects for our current 14-property portfolio.
For asset management inquiries, contact Geoff Kahl at 617 603 5417
If you are currently a commercial tenant of Samuels & Associates and would like assistance, contact Kristy Partlow 617 603 5470 





      Our People    





  
 Steve Samuels 

 Steve Samuels
Chairman & Principal

The founder and chairman of Samuels & Associates, Steve Samuels has built a team of professionals committed to the core principles of the firm — place making, community engagement and positive street level experiences. “I see the intersection of creativity and functional practicality as the firm’s greatest strength,” he notes, “we come up with out-of-the-box solutions and bring them into reality. Everybody here carries a very distinct tool to the dance to be able to get the job done.”
A third generation developer, Steve has been involved in the development world since he entered Ohio State University to study real estate.
Steve is also an avid guitarist, skier, tennis player and hiker, with a penchant for making things with his hands. “I have a multitude of interests outside of the business,” he points out.
Currently serving on the board of directors for the Boston Police Athletic League, Steve is also on the board of Emerson College and the Children’s Hospital Trust, serving on their real estate committee.
  



  
 Joel Sklar 

 Joel Sklar
President & Principal

Real estate is in Joel’s DNA. The son of a Cuban architect, he grew up in Miami, traveling to inspect sites with his father and even helping to design two of his childhood homes. After attending the University of Florida and Harvard Law School, Joel became a partner at Goulston & Storrs. After leaving to conduct real estate deals on his own, he soon joined his friend, Steve Samuels, who was looking for some help in growing a development company.
Joel is passionate about seeing a new district come to life after years of work. “That’s the best part, watching our new project come to life and be woven into the fabric of the community in which it resides.”
Outside of work Joel enjoys being, quite literally, outside. He loves cycling, boating, tennis “and any other sports I can still survive.” He’s also quick to add, “I’m a big fan of American craft beers.”
Joel serves as Chair of the Boston Main Streets Foundations and as a member of the Board of Nuestra Comunidad Development Corporation, a non-profit CDC that builds affordable housing and promotes economic development in Roxbury.
  



  
 Leslie G. Cohen 

 Leslie G. Cohen
Principal, Chief Operating Officer

Leslie Cohen is the COO of Samuels & Associates. She is responsible for executing the strategic vision of the firm across numerous multi-billion dollar developments in Boston and the surrounding communities. Since joining Samuels & Associates in 2002, she has successfully overseen the rise of major projects like Pierce, a 30-story luxury residence in The Fenway and Continuum, a pioneering mixed-use development in the heart of North Allston, MA.
Cohen serves as the President of CREW Boston (formerly NEWiRE); she is also a member of ULI and active on the local and national level, while also serving on the NAIOP MA Board of Directors. Cohen serves on the building committee at the West End House in Allston, on the Board of Trustees and Grounds Committee at Tufts University, and volunteers at the Heath School. 
In 2013, Cohen was selected as a Boston Business Journal’s 40 under 40 honoree, and in 2014 she was chosen as a recipient of Bisnow’s 2014 Top 50 women in commercial real estate award. 
  



  
 Peter Sougarides 

 Peter Sougarides
Executive Vice President, Development & Principal

A Bostonian born and bred, Peter Sougarides has made a legacy of his lifelong passion for bringing positive growth to neighborhoods, particularly the ones in which he grew up. It was this passion that first inspired a Civil Engineering degree from Northeastern University and stints at Sumner Schein and Cabot, Cabot & Forbes. Since joining Samuels & Associates in 2000, Peter has used his considerable expertise to oversee the development of major urban mixed-use projects in the vibrant and ideally located Fenway area. He has successfully overseen the Fenway Triangle Trilogy, 1330 Boylston, and a state-of–art medical facility for Fenway Health, a non-profit health center. He currently leads development of the Van Ness, Landmark and other significant Fenway projects. Peter is on the board of the Emerald Necklace conservancy, A Better City (ABC), the Urban Land Institute and the International Council of Shopping Centers.
 
  



  
 Tom Bloch 

 Tom Bloch
Principal, Head of Asset Management

A lifelong lover of architecture and urban planning, Tom Bloch majored in the disciplines as a student at Yale University. From there he served as a Peace Corps volunteer in Panama City, developing roads, sewers and other essential infrastructure components. It was only after his time at Harvard Law School, and a nearly 30-year career at Goulston and Storrs, that he returned to the development world, being hired by Steve Samuels in 2005 as the firm’s General Counsel.
As Tom tells it,  “Buildings are in my blood. I actually dropped out of law school after the first year and worked as a carpenter renovating houses in the Back Bay with my old friend and the super at the time, Bob Vila.”
Both Tom and the firm are passionate about doing the best for the client. It’s about reputation. “Our word is our bond. I’d like to us to be remembered as being good to work with and good to work for.”
While not in the office or spending time as the lawyer and member of the board for Nuestra Comunidad Development Corporation, a non-profit CDC that builds affordable housing and promotes economic development in Roxbury, Tom can be found traveling, eating and drinking. “I’m an equal opportunity eater. I love a good Big Mac and I love a fantastic striped bass with coriander sauce…” 
  



  
 Roger DaPrato 

 Roger DaPrato
Chief Financial Officer

With extensive experience in the world of real estate finance, Roger brings nearly 30 years of expertise to Samuels & Associates. He began his career in the accounting group at John Hancock, starting down a path that he’s followed ever since. Roger spent 16 years at John Hancock, rising to Chief Financial Officer for the Realty Services department. Immediately prior to joining Samuels and Associates, he spent time at the Codman Company as Vice President and Controller of Property Management.
Passionate about managing major financial transactions that lead to impactful development, Roger is committed to the firm’s key tenet of creative place making. A native of the Boston area, he is proud to have a hand in developing and revitalizing the neighborhoods he has lived and worked in.
  



  
 Abe Menzin 

 Abe Menzin
SVP, Development 

An expert in all aspects of complex, mixed-use urban development, Abe Menzin is fascinated by the interdisciplinary nature of the field. “I love complex projects,” he notes, “early in my career I managed the construction of large projects, but having a hand in shaping the direction of the project is what drew me to development.”
Abe arrived at Samuels & Associates in 2010 with the desire to, in his words, “work with the best people in the industry.” He’s passionate about working on projects, like the Van Ness and Landmark Center, which make a positive impact on the community. He’s especially fond of those ventures that require large teams, many moving parts and meticulous planning.
While not building communities for thousands of Boston residents, Abe can be found spending time with his four kids and, in the winter, perfecting his backyard skating rink.
Abe holds an undergraduate degree from Tufts University and two master’s degrees, one in real estate development and the other in civil engineering, from MIT. He has served as co-Chair of the CJP’s Real Estate team and was a pro bono real estate advisor for Cradles to Crayons. 
  



  
 Geoff Kahl 

 Geoff Kahl
Regional Portfolio Manager

A portfolio manager with over 14 years of experience, Geoff Kahl is passionate about outperforming expectations and streamlining the asset management for Samuels & Associates’ operations in the Boston region. Geoff began his career at Archstone, one of the country’s major real estate investment trusts, managing all aspects of its premiere luxury apartment buildings. He joined Samuels & Associates in 2009 and has had a hand in managing some of the firm’s highest-visibility Boston-based projects.
Born in Virginia, but also raised in Texas, West Virginia and Florida, Geoff has left his southern roots and become an adopted New Englander. 
Geoff is a member of the Institute of Real Estate Management, the NAA and the NAIOP Commercial Real Estate Development Association.
  



  
 Grace Gorman 

 Grace Gorman
Senior Paralegal

When Grace Gorman first joined Samuels & Associates as Assistant Lease Administrator in 1999, she saw her role as a stepping stone, not a lifetime commitment.  “Development chose me,” she remarks. “I had never envisioned myself working in real estate…but I soon realized it was the perfect fit.”
In her current role as Senior Paralegal, Grace draws on her extensive experience in Lease Administration as well as a passion for detail and organization. She particularly enjoys the analytical nature of legal writing.
Grace holds a Certificate in Paralegal Studies from Boston University as well as a B.A. in French Language and Literature from the University of Rhode Island, and is a member of the Massachusetts Paralegal Association.
A self-described foodie and travel junkie, Grace also enjoys hiking, reading, and spending time with family and friends and her dog, Nara.
  



  
 Jason Bansfield 

 Jason Bansfield
Regional Portfolio Manager

A proven expert in real estate finance, Jason Bansfield has over 18 years of experience in property and asset management. He started his career at the Massachusetts Port Authority while he was still a student at the Wentworth Institute of Technology. With moves to Fidelity Investments, The Beal Companies, Brickpoint Poperties and The RAM Companies, Jason was looking to get back to his Boston roots and sought a role at Samuels & Associates. “It was meeting the executives here [at Samuels] that ultimately fueled the fire,” he notes.
Perhaps not surprisingly, Jason is passionate about seeing projects come to fruition, “it’s certainly rewarding to see something come to a successful end after a long and complex journey.” But when questioned about his true loves, Jason is quick to answer: family. “With a two-year old, a three-year old and a baby due soon, family is the ultimate passion.”
  



  
 Kevin Luczkow  

 Kevin Luczkow 
Senior Construction Manager

As Senior Construction Manager at Samuels & Associates, Kevin strives to understand the overall needs of the rest of the team — from design to operations and beyond. He brings focus to the construction process, ensuring the team’s goals of building communities are met while staying on budget and on schedule.
With a degree in Architecture from Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh, PA, Kevin went on to work in every side of the business, from development to contracting and subcontracting.  Before joining the Samuels’ team, Kevin spent 8 years working for the Kraft Group in Foxborough, MA, helping build everything from Gillette Stadium, to private and multi-unit residences, and Patriot Place.
Kevin started at Samuels in 2015, bringing his approach of finding the fun in the challenges to a team of diverse backgrounds — all with the same goal of transforming neighborhoods
A true outdoorsman, he takes part in the active community at Samuels by skiing, running and biking.  
  



  
 Lawrence S. Green 

 Lawrence S. Green
Senior Construction Advisor

Born and raised in Boston, Larry Green is an engineer and construction director with over 50 years of industry experience. He began his distinguished professional career in 1963 soon after completing time in the U.S. Army. For the next 39 years he worked for multiple development and construction companies, becoming Vice President of Project Development for Beaver Builders Ltd., President of LSG Corporation and President of ABREEN Corporation.
“I made the switch to full-time Samuels & Associates consultant around 2002,” he notes. It’s here that Larry uses his considerable expertise to ensure each of his jobs is on budget and on time. “That’s my passion,” Larry points out.
Not quite sure what he’ll do when he grows up, Larry is an avid pilot, once having owned a Korean War jet trainer and the current owner of a twin engine prop plane. When asked about his ideal development project, he is quick to respond, “nothing with great beauty; something supremely functional.”
A licensed Registered Professional Engineer, Civil and Structural in the state of New Hampshire, Larry is also a licensed Registered Professional Engineer, Civil and holds a Builder’s License, Unrestricted in Massachusetts.
  



  
 Mike Fitzpatrick 

 Mike Fitzpatrick
VP of Development

A trained civil engineer, Mike Fitzpatrick has extensive experience building communities from the ground up. But his passion for the craft of development began long before he graduated from UMASS Amherst with a BS in civil engineering. “From a very young age I’ve had an interest in building and transforming things from scratch,” he notes.
It was this deep-rooted interest in making things that inspired an engineering education and an eight-year career with BSC Group. But, while working on the Hingham Shipyard redevelopment project, Mike was exposed to the dynamic and integrated development model of Samuels & Associates. He was hooked.
As Mike says, “I love challenges. I love uncovering the unique conditions of any given project and then finding the solutions.” As a current VP of Development working in a vibrant urban environment, these challenges are never in short supply. 
  



  
 Sabrina Sandberg 

 Sabrina Sandberg
Director of Marketing

A consumer goods brand marketer by trade, Sabrina heads the marketing department at Samuels & Associates. Having worked for global brands such as PUMA, Tretorn and Carlsberg Brewery, both in the States and abroad, and for the American Express brand at Ogilvy & Mather, she brings a diverse range of strategic marketing experience to the firm. She believes in Samuels & Associates’ approach in doing things differently, unlike any other real estate company.
Sabrina is thrilled to be shaping communities through her work. “To be able have a tangible and long-lasting impact on a community is compelling. To listen to people, understand their needs and bring their stories to life, while fulfilling their needs— it’s truly rewarding.”
A native New Englander, Sabrina grew up in Boston and attended Stonehill College. Sabrina currently serves on Mayor Martin Walsh's Onein3 Council.
  



  
  Steve Bonelli 

  Steve Bonelli
Senior Vice President, Finance & Acquisitions

To Steve Bonelli, it’s all about making places — creating something that people can enjoy. As he says, “Underwriting and analyzing a complex project, putting it together and then seeing it come out of the ground, something that I’ve had a hand in — that’s what I’m passionate about.”
Steve joined Samuels & Associates in 2013, impressed with the firm’s work in and around The Fenway. “Samuels is one of the best firms in the city for place making. We make spaces that are truly transformative,” he remarks.
Outside of work, Steve is passionate about the outdoors, particularly hiking and downhill skiing with his wife Nancy and son Ryan.
A business administration and international finance graduate of the University of Vermont, Steve also holds a master’s degree from MIT in real estate development. He is involved with the MIT alumni association and is a member of the Boston chapters of ULI, NAIOP, and REFA. 
  


 



      Our Careers    



We are always looking for talented people to join the Samuels & Associates team. Please email your resume to Leslie Cohen at lcohen@samuelsre.com if you are interested in being considered for future opportunities.Current Openings 


 Sr. Construction Project Manager 
 REPORTS TO: Director of ConstructionPRIMARY OBJECTIVE: In the design and planning stages of a multi-phased mixed use high-rise development project in the City of Boston, review, evaluate and advise Vice President of Development and Director of Construction of cost impacts, constructability issues, and schedule implications. Upon construction commencement, act as the developer’s on-site representative overseeing all aspects of construction on behalf of the Owner.DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Concept / Schematic Phase:Provide technical construction management support to the development team.Provide technical expertise in materials, products, techniques and procedures.Review the general contractor’s project schedule for logic and accuracy.Review the conceptual budget from the general contractor and identify strategies to achieve development budget.Review due diligence reports from the owner’s consultants.Construction Documents:Review progress of construction documents and budget at each schedule milestone, typically after schematic documents, 50% design documents, and permit submission documents.Provide feedback on constructability and identify potential schedule impacts.Lead value engineering exercises as required.Permitting / Preconstruction Phase:Meet with city departments and monitor permit review progress and acquire all required approvals and permits.Review plans and specifications to assure a complete scope of construction is captured and identified.Finalize construction budget with the general contractor.Review the general contractor’s qualifications and assumptions and provide feedback to the owner.Participate in contract negation with the general contractor.Construction Phase:Attend weekly owner, architect, and general contractor project meetings.Attend weekly meetings with the general manager and tenant coordinator of the existing building to coordinate tenant relocations and upcoming construction activities.Hire owner consultants required for testing and inspectionsParticipate in the general contractor’s subcontractor scope review meetingsReview and approve the general contractor’s subcontractor approval letters.Review all testing reports from the geotechnical engineer, material testing, commissioning agent and special inspectors.Review all requests for information and monitor response.Review all submittals and monitor approval.Prepare monthly construction update for the developer’s report.Create and maintain a detailed cost report and monthly forecastCoordinate Commissioning and LEED inspections and reporting.Coordinate with and monitor the Contractor quality of work.Review general contractor’s monthly requisition for payment including verification of stored materials and subcontractor lien releases.Review all change order requests, allowances, and owner change orders for approval.Review all project close-out documents with the general contractor and owner prior to contract closeout.                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                     Qualifications:The successful candidate must possess a bachelor’s degree and have a minimum of 10-15 years prior experience working with either a real estate developer, general contractor or in a construction management role overseeing large complex multi-year construction projects. Prior experience with mixed use high-rise construction, phased occupancy, tenant relocations and multi-residential apartment and condominium construction is required. The candidate must be well organized and an effective communicator that is able to direct and motivate the design and construction team.   

 



      Our History    




        2016  
 Winner of the 2015 Commercial Brokers Association Landlord of the Year Award.  

        2015  
 Opens Van Ness, a mixed-use residential, retail and office space. Home to Boston's first urban Target.   

        2015  
 Breaks ground on Pierce Boston, a mixed-use tower built to house 109 condominium units, 240 rental units and over 20,000 square feet of street-level retail space
 

        2015  
 Opens Continuum, a mixed use residential and retail development, located in lower Allston adjacent to Harvard's Allston Campus.  

        2014  
 Receives approval for the expansion of Landmark Center to include retail and residential space, as well as Boston’s first Wegmans supermarket.  

View More



        2014  
 Opens The Verb Hotel at 1271 Boylston Street in The Fenway.  

        2014  
 Accepts the 2014 Prism Awards for Achievement in Building & Design for the Hingham Shipyard/Moorings  

        2014  
 Steve Samuels, Samuels & Associates receive A Better City, Norman B. Leventhal Land Development Award  

        2014  
 Accepts Fenway CDC Joyce Foster Community Impact Award  

        2014  
 Leslie Cohen named a Power Woman in Real Estate by BISNOW.   

        2013  
 Receives approval for The Point, a residential (320 unit) and retail (33,000 square feet) development at the intersection of Brookline Avenue and Boylston Street in The Fenway.  

        2013  
 Breaks ground on a mixed use residential and retail project on Harvard University-owned land in Allston (Barry’s Corner).  

        2012  
 Begins construction on Van Ness, a mixed-use residential (172 rental units), retail (30,000 sq. ft.) and office (232,000 sq. ft.) building in The Fenway.  

        2011  
 Acquires Landmark Center, a mixed-use office and retail building in The Fenway.  

        2010  
 Tasty Burger opens in a Samuels-owned building in Fenway, creating a lively new destination in a former gas station site.  

        2006  
 Began The Hingham Shipyard, a mixed-use waterfront village in Hingham, MA.  

        2006  
 Started the 1330 Boylston project, a 450,000 square foot mixed-use development that opened in 2008 with 200 luxury apartments, street-level retail space and 90,000 square feet devoted to the Fenway Community Health Center.   

        2004  
 Broke ground on the Fenway Triangle Trilogy, a one million square foot, mixed-use development in the heart of Boston’s Fenway neighborhood.  

        2004  
 Sold 11 of the properties purchased only two years prior for $205 million, earning a significant return on the investment while improving the occupancy rates from 43% to 90%.  

        2002  
 Partnered with Edens & Avant to purchase 36 retail centers in the Northeast from Konover & Associates.  

        2001  
 Undertook a significant and challenging pro bono project to revitalize The Mecca at Grove Hall, an urban shopping center in Roxbury, MA, creating over 400 jobs and opening with 100% occupancy.  

        1998  
 Sold a portfolio of 20 shopping centers to Edens & Avant for $250 million while remaining as leasing and property managers for the majority of the locations.  

        1993  
 Produced the pioneering 440,000 square foot South Bay Center in Dorchester, MA, the first development of its type in an urban location.  

        1986  
 Developed Brookside Shopping Center in Bridgeport, CT, a 119,000 square foot shopping center that services over 250,000 people.  


 



      Our Community    





Honored to call New England our home, we proudly support a number of local charitable and industry organizations. 
Allston Village Main streets
A non-profit dedicated to the health and vibrance of Allston, MA, Allston Village Main Streets promotes various local businesses and village-wide infrastructure improvements.
Audubon Circle Neighborhood Association
The Audubon Circle Neighborhood Association was formed in 1982 to represent the residents, property owners and business owners of the Audubon Circle neighborhood. The Circle is a historic, residential "pocket" neighborhood in Boston's Fenway district tucked between Brookline on the west, Kenmore and Fenway Park on the east, the Massachusetts Turnpike and Boston University to the north, and the Boston Fens to the south.
Back Bay Association
The primary focus for the Back Bay Association (BBA) and its 400 members is to ensure the economic vitality of the Back Bay and to initiate programs that improve, promote, and protect the quality of life in the neighborhood.
Boston Children’s Hospital
Boston Children's Hospital is a 395-bed comprehensive center for pediatric health care. As one of the largest pediatric medical centers in the United States, Children's offers a complete range of health care services for children from birth through 21 years of age. Boston Children's is the #1 ranked children's hospital in 8 of the 10 evaluated specialties, according to the 2014-15 edition of Best Children's Hospitals by U.S. News & World Report.  
Boston Main Streets Foundation
Established in 1995 to help revitalize the city’s neighborhood commercial districts, the foundation has become a national model and was chosen by the Pew Partnership for Civic Change as one of the 19 Solutions for America.
crew boston
CREW Boston, formerly New England Women in Real Estate (NEWiRE), is the region's leading professional organization promoting the advancement of women within the commercial real estate industry.
Emerald Necklace Conservancy
The Emerald Necklace Conservancy is a private non-profit stewardship organization founded in 1998 to maintain, restore and protect the parks of the Emerald Necklace designed by Frederick Law Olmsted for all to explore, use and enjoy. Governed by a board of directors, the conservancy brings together representatives of both the private and public sectors to carry out these goals.
Emerson College
While Emerson remains committed to its historic mission as a specialized academic institution, its curriculum reflects the emergence of interdisciplinary study as a mode for teaching and learning, and affirms new directions for the fields of communication and the arts.
Fenway Alliance
A consortium of academic, cultural and arts organizations, the Alliance works collaboratively to enhance the cultural, environmental and economic vitality of the Fenway area.
Fenway CDC
Fenway CDC builds and preserves affordable housing and champions local projects that engage the entire Fenway community in protecting the neighborhood’s economic and racial diversity as well as its long-term vibrancy.
Fenway Civic Association
Fenway Civic is a board-driven, all-volunteer, member-supported organization whose goal is to promote and sustain a vital, livable neighborhood.  Its volunteers write periodic newsletters, organize a variety of special events for members, and are fully informed participants in all public processes.  Unlike many community organizations, FCA does not receive public funds and has no financial stake in the decisions being made, enabling it to act wholly in the best interest of the neighborhood.  There are no corporate sponsors, no slick brochures, no hired staff, and no office.  But what FCA does have is the ear of our public officials and the respect of the residents, institutions, and businesses, who depend on FCA leaders for their expertise, experience and honest work on behalf of a better Fenway.
INternational council of shopping centers
Founded in 1957, ICSC is the premier global trade association of the shopping center industry. Its more than 63,000 members in over 100 countries include shopping center owners, developers, managers, marketing specialists, investors, retailers and brokers, as well as academics and public officials.  As the global industry trade association, ICSC links with more than 25 national and regional shopping center councils throughout the world.
Juvenile Diabetes Foundation Research International
The leading charitable funder and advocate of type 1 (juvenile) diabetes research worldwide, the mission of the Foundation is to find a cure for diabetes and its complications through the support of cutting-edge research.
NAIOP
NAIOP Massachusetts is the acknowledged leader in real estate advocacy and policy development for owners, developers and investors. It is the premiere organization for education and networking for the commercial real estate industry.
Neighborhood Association of the Back Bay (NABB)
NABB's purpose is to combat community deterioration, to preserve and protect the architectural beauty of the Back Bay, and to further Back Bay's residential character.
NUESTRA COMUNIDAD DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
Nuestra Comunidad Development Corporation is devoted to building the wealth and enhancing the physical, economic, and social well-being of Roxbury and other underserved populations in greater Boston through a community-driven process that promotes self-sufficiency and neighborhood revitalization.
Urban land Institute
The ULI Boston District Council, Serving the Six New England States, (ULIB) is committed to advancing ULI’s Mission to “provide leadership in the responsible use of land and in creating and sustaining thriving communities” through its evolving platform as the leading real estate organization for convening and sharing best practices in our region.
west end house
West End House is the largest youth development agency in the Allston-Brighton community providing high-impact programs that ensure that our young people are succeeding academically, exploring and mastering the arts, developing career readiness skills and adopting healthy lifestyles.
  










 

 






Careers
Employees
Site map
Terms of Use
Privacy
 




                © 2017 Samuels & Associates.

136 Brookline Ave, Boston, MA



 
 





Eric Samuels | Product tags | Stevens Magic Emporium                            1-316-683-95821-316-686-2442      NavigationStevens Magic EmporiumStevens Magic Emporium – A full service Magic Dealer and Shop with Professional Magic, Stage Magic, Close-up Magic, and Illusions. Search for:       Eric Samuels  Showing all 4 results Sort by popularitySort by average ratingSort by newnessSort by price: low to highSort by price: high to low   $1,099.00 Desert Island – Eric SamuelsEffects, Mentalism Magic, Parlor Magic, What's NewAdd  $1,645.00 Protected: The Black Box The (R) Evolution of Q&AExclusives, Mentalism Magic, Parlor Magic, Stage Magic, What's NewAdd  $1,645.00 The Black Box The (R) Evolution of Q&AExclusives, Mentalism Magic, Parlor Magic, Stage Magic, What's NewAdd  $249.00 The Black Bin – Eric SamuelsMentalism Magic, Parlor Magic, Stage Magic, What's NewAdd PRODUCT CATEGORIESAccessoriesAnnouncementsAntiques/EstateAudio/VideoBack in StockBooksClearanceDownloadable ProductsEffectsExclusivesFeatured ItemsFREEGamblingGift CertificatesHalloween ProductsHypnotismMentalism MagicOn SalePending ProductsPre-SaleQR CodeSpecial-PricingWhat's HotWhat's NewArticle SearchSearch for:    Popular Magic Now        Follow UsInteresting Products   Dancing Glowing Rose (Voitko) (Version 2)  $400.00   Performance Pad Maroon - David Martinez (Exclusive)  $130.00   Empire Color-Changing Knives  $12.50   Die Cipher II  $60.00   Check It Out - Ton Onosaka  $22.50 1-316-683-95821-316-686-2442  Contact UsStevens Magic Emporium 2520 E. Douglas Ave. Wichita, Kansas 67214-4514  (USA)Tel:  1-316-683-9582 Fax:  1-316-686-2442Contact SMEJoe’s FlashReceive special offersHear about promotions firstFirst in line for clearance itemsAnd sometimes FREE MAGIC in your orderSign up for Joe's Email Flash (newsletter) now.Best Sellers   Chamberlain Golden Touch Lotion (2 oz., Travel Size)  $5.50   Palming Coin  (Nielsen)  $4.25   SOS. Silent, Original, Suspension - Buma (House of Magic)  $48.00On Sale Now   Coin Coalition Eisenhower  $125.00 $90.00   ColorLopes TM with Value Added Download! Free with Min. $50 Purchase  $15.00 $0.00   Odd Quad (Cards and DVD) by Fooler Doolers  $12.95 $6.00   Create a new list                     














Products













Amity Nowling     850-293-6455  Matt Larson    850-910-5992  Carol Ann Love     850-598-7500 2313 Highway 87 Navarre, Florida 32566 Residential Contractors, House Plan Design Services in 2D & PhotoRealistic 3DLocated In The Crystal Shores Real Estate Office1HomeAbout UsFeatured HomesServicesPhoto GalleryDesign CenterContact UsWebsite Designed at Homestead Make a Website and List Your BusinessSamuel Steven's & Associates, Inc. ProductsThe " Tampa"This luxurious home features an open floor plan and beautiful details. With four bedrooms, three bathrooms, study, and formal dining room, this home has everything you could ever want and more! Master Suite offers a huge closet and bathroom perfect for relaxing. Other bedrooms and bathrooms have plenty of space to grow your family. This home comes standard with crown molding, trey ceilings in Master Bedroom and Kitchen, as well as granite counter-tops. At 3,267 square feet, this house is the perfect home for entertaining!                 Gallery              3D Tours 









Steven Samuels, Indiana Internal Medicine Consultants - Internal Medicine Doctor in Greenwood, IN









































Skip to contentCheck Your Symptoms Find A Doctor Find Lowest Drug PricesSign In Sign UpSubscribeMy ProfileWelcome My ToolsMy WebMD PagesMy AccountSign Out  Subscribe



Back to Results | Physician Directory  Internal Medicine  Indiana  Greenwood  Dr. Steven M. Samuels, MD














Physician Directory

Hospital Directory
Pharmacy Directory
Insurance Directory



Find a Doctor







Search by Name, Specialty, Condition or ProcedureEnter Zip Code or City, State





Is this you?Enhance your profile.


Steven M. Samuels, MD
Internal Medicine, Internal Medicine - Geriatrics


55 RatingsRate This Doctor

Indiana Internal Medical
701 E County Line Rd Ste 101Greenwood, IN 46143
Insurance Accepted (25)


(317) 885-2860







Dr. Samuels's Overview
Dr. Samuels graduated from the Indiana University School of Medicine in 1988. He works in Greenwood, IN and specializes in Internal Medicine and Internal Medicine - Geriatrics. Dr. Samuels is affiliated with Franciscan Saint Francis Health, Kindred Hospital Indianapolis North and Kindred Hospital Indianapolis South.Dr. Samuels's Experience
Years in Practice: 29

Conditions Treated by Dr. Samuels

Atrial Fibrillation and Atrial Flutter
Bacterial Pneumonia
Bronchial Asthma
Diabetes Mellitus (DM)
Disorders of Lipoid Metabolism
View More



Procedures Performed by Dr. Samuels

Bone Marrow Biopsy
Arthrocentesis
Destruction of Benign/Premalignant Skin Lesions
Electrocardiogram (EKG or ECG)
Skin Tags Removal
View More



Dr. Samuels's Specialties
Internal Medicine, Internal Medicine - Geriatrics


Dr. Samuels's Education & Training
Medical School: Indiana University School of Medicine; Graduated 1988
Dr. Samuels's RatingRate This Doctor
Overall Rating
Physician

Explains conditions & treatments
Takes time to answer my questions
Provides follow-up as needed
View All Ratings
Dr. Samuels's Accepted Insurance
Please verify insurance information directly with your doctor's office as it may change frequently.

Aetna Choice POS II
Aetna Managed Choice POS Open Access
Aetna Signature Administrators PPO
Anthem Blue Access PPO
Anthem Blue Preferred HMO
BCBS Blue Card PPO
BCBS IL PPO
CareSource Just4Me IN
CIGNA HMO
CIGNA Open Access Plus
View More
Dr. Samuels's Office Information & Appointments

Office Locations
Indiana Internal MedicalIndiana Internal Medicine Consultants
701 E County Line Rd Ste 101Greenwood, IN 46143(317) 885-2860
Directions
Office Hours and Information
Fax: (317) 885-2869
Practice Website: iimconline.net
Accepting New Patients:  Yes
Medicare Accepted:  Yes
Medicaid Accepted:  Yes



Monday 
8:00 AM - 5:00 PM


Tuesday 
8:00 AM - 5:00 PM


Wednesday 
8:00 AM - 5:00 PM


Thursday 
8:00 AM - 5:00 PM


Friday 
8:00 AM - 5:00 PM


Saturday 
Closed


Sunday 
Closed







Other Physicians in Dr. Samuels's Practice

Sarfraz Ahmad, MDInternal Medicine
Qamer Ahmed, MDInternal Medicine
Asif Ansari, MDInternal Medicine
Buland-Iqbal Ashraf, MDInternal Medicine
Cristina L. AshworthFamily Medicine, Internal Medicine
Miguel R. Balfour, MDFamily Medicine
Bruce H. Bender, MDInternal Medicine
Sherry L. BenderFamily Medicine
Amanda BrattonFamily Medicine
Gerald L. Braverman, MDCritical Care Medicine, Internal Medicine
Aaron S. Bruns, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
William C. Buffie, MDInternal Medicine
Robert S. Daly, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
Sachin T. Dave, MDInternal Medicine
Todd M. Dudley, MDInternal Medicine
Jacquie Estes-WertzbergerInternal Medicine
Larry M. Greenbaum, MDInternal Medicine, Rheumatology
Jacquiline N. GreenwaldFamily Medicine
Eric P. Hartman, MDFamily Medicine
Ruxandra Ionescu, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Critical Care Medicine
Roland L. IsaacsInternal Medicine
Charles M. Janssens, DOInternal Medicine
Faisal A. Khan, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
Delores E. Kotschwar, MDInternal Medicine
Sandeep Kukreja, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
Hannah E. MasonInternal Medicine
Kristen MouncePulmonary Medicine
Manfred P. Mueller, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
Winston R. Nara, MDPulmonary Medicine, Sleep Medicine
Ajay K. Ponugoti, MDInternal Medicine
Shimoga R. Prakash, MDInternal Medicine, Hospitalist
Gina M. SaylorFamily Medicine
Sheryl M. SchneiderInternal Medicine
Haider R. Shah, MDInternal Medicine
Mohammed F. Sharief, MDInfectious Disease
Imad Shawa, MDInternal Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
Tara SimonFamily Medicine
Abhinav Singh, MDInternal Medicine, Sleep Medicine
Faron R. Skelton, MDPulmonary Medicine, Pulmonary Critical Care Medicine
Michael J. Snyder, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
Mohammad Tariq, MDCritical Care Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
Fadi I. Tawfik, MDInternal Medicine
William E. Turton, MDInternal Medicine
Meeta Vijayvargiya, MDInternal Medicine
James C. Webb, MDFamily Medicine
Joyce YakimickiInternal Medicine
Subaila Zia, MDInternal Medicine, Pulmonary Medicine
View More



Dr. Samuels's Hospital Affiliations

Franciscan Saint Francis Health
Kindred Hospital Indianapolis North
Kindred Hospital Indianapolis South


Next: Dr. Samuels's Experience












Office Locations 




View More Locations





Other Internists Near Greenwood, IN



James L. Gahimer, MD
107 N State Road 135 Ste 103Greenwood, IN 46142


Jennifer L. Adolay
107 N State Road 135 Ste 103Greenwood, IN 46142


Mohammed A. Majid, MD
3089 W Fairview RdGreenwood, IN 46142


Edwin J. Shakun, MD
1001 N Madison AveGreenwood, IN 46142


Daniel T. Saha, MD
3000 S State Road 135 Ste 310Greenwood, IN 46143


View More Internists

















Appointments Provided by HealthPost*




*By selecting an appointment time above you are leaving the WebMD site and going to HealthPost, a third-party. HealthPost is solely responsible for this service.



Online Appointments*
Book an Appointment with a Doctor Online Today

Quick and easy process
No need to wait on hold for an appointment

Continue

*Online appointments for this doctor are managed by HealthPost, a third party. By clicking on continue, you will be taken to a screen managed by HealthPost. HealthPost is solely responsible for this service.


















Top US Metropolitan Areas


Atlanta
Austin
Baltimore
Birmingham
Boston
Buffalo
Charlotte
Chicago
Cincinnati
Cleveland


Columbus
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Hartford
Houston
Indianapolis
Jacksonville
Kansas City
Las Vegas


Los Angeles
Louisville
Memphis
Miami
Milwaukee
Minneapolis
Nashville
New Orleans
New York
Oklahoma City


Orlando
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Pittsburgh
Portland
Providence
Raleigh
Richmond
Sacramento
Saint Louis


Salt Lake City
San Antonio
San Bernardino
San Diego
San Francisco
San Jose
Seattle
Tampa
Virginia Beach
Washington DC


View All Locations


Health Solutions From Our Sponsors




Knee Pain Management


Bent Fingers?


Cancer Treatments


Online Hearing Test


Seeking Cancer Care?


Painful Knees?


Cancer Support


Treat Pet Anxiety


Exercise & OA Knee Pain


Care for Valve Disease?


Pet Food Facts


Hearing Loss Help


Ringing in the Ears


Find Infant Formula


Aortic Valve Stenosis























  



















Dr. Steven Samuels, MD - Greenwood, IN - Internal Medicine | Healthgrades.com









































HealthgradesDr. Steven Samuels, MD(52)Login MenuSearch Doctors, Hospitals, Specialties or ProceduresCloseHealthgradesSearchSearchNearSearchDr. Steven Samuels, MDSaveInternal Medicine  | Male(52) Leave a ReviewIndiana Internl Medcn Cnsltnts 701 E County Line Rd Ste 101 Greenwood,  IN 46143 Get Directions (317) 885-2860View Insurance Accepted  Suggest an editDr. Steven Samuels, MD is an internal medicine doctor who practices in Greenwood, IN.  He is 55 years old and has been practicing for 29 years.  Dr. Samuels is affiliated with Franciscan Health Mooresville , Community Hospital South, Franciscan Health Indianapolis  and Johnson Memorial Hospital.ADVERTISEMENT






 




Learn about this doctorDr. Samuels' Experience0ExperienceMatchExperience MatchSee how Dr. Samuels' experience matches your preferences.1SpecialtiesFor the best healthcare for your needs, choose a doctor who specializes in your medical condition.1Board CertificationsBoard certification indicates that a doctor is highly qualified in the medical field in which they practice.0Conditions TreatedCheck to see that this provider treats your medical condition.0Procedures PerformedCheck to see that this provider performs the procedure that you need.Background CheckCheck to see if your provider has any malpractices, board actions, or sanctions.EducationLearn more about where this provider went to medical school, residency, and more.Awards & RecognitionView information about special awards and recognition for this provider.Languages SpokenCheck to see what languages this provider and/or staff speak.Memberships & Professional AffiliationsView memberships and affiliations associated with this provider.Overall Patient Satisfaction52responsesLikelihood of recommending Dr. Samuels to family and friends is 4 out of 5Have you seen Dr. Samuels?Leave a ReviewSee all 1075 Internal Medicine Specialists in Greenwood, IN 46143Dr. August Natalie, MDDermatology(80)Dr. Nabeel Farooqui, MDAllergy & Immunology(93)Dr. Abhinav Singh, MDSleep Medicine(19)Dr. Peter Turlo, MDHospital Medicine(15)Dr. Nadeem Ikhlaque, MDOncology(13)Dr. William Berg, MDInternal Medicine(9)View MoreVisiting Dr. SamuelsDr. Samuels accepts 22 insurance carriersView all insurance carriers Dr. Samuels is now accepting new patients Indiana Internl Medcn Cnsltnts701 E County Line Rd Ste 101Greenwood, IN 46143(317) 885-2860Get DirectionsAffiliated HospitalsHospital QualityCheck out the quality of care at the 4 hospitals where Dr. Samuels has admitting privileges.Community Hospital South1402 E County Line RdIndianapolis, IN 46227Hospital Awards0Overall Patient ExperienceView Hospital ProfileFranciscan Health Indianapolis 8111 S Emerson AveIndianapolis, IN 46237Hospital Awards0Overall Patient ExperienceView Hospital ProfileFranciscan Health Mooresville 1201 Hadley RdMooresville, IN 46158Hospital Awards0Overall Patient ExperienceView Hospital ProfileJohnson Memorial Hospital1125 W Jefferson StFranklin, IN 46131Hospital Awards0Overall Patient ExperienceView Hospital ProfileDr. Samuels' ReviewsLikelihood of recommending Dr. Samuels to family and friends4.0 based on 52 total reviews (31 with comments)Leave a reviewDr. Samuels' PerformanceTrustworthinessVERY GOODExplains condition(s) wellVERY GOODAnswers QuestionsVERY GOODTime well spentVERY GOODOffice & Staff PerformanceSchedulingEXCELLENTOffice environmentEXCELLENTStaff friendlinessEXCELLENTAverage wait time 10 to 15 minutesPatient Comments (31)55-N. Black in Brownsburg, IN | May 17, 2017Dr. Samuels is top notch and I recommend him to anyone. He's the best doctor I've ever had. Sharp, quick thinking on his feet, extremely knowledgeable, and comprehensive in his treatment and advice.  55-Joni in Greenwood In | May 05, 2017Dr Samuels is the best medical doctor our family has ever had. He is proactive not reactive. 

He is sensitive and understanding. 
55-Mike in Greenwood, IN | Sep 12, 2016Dr. Samuels has been my Primary Care Physician (PCP) for 10 plus years.  I would not go to another doctor.  He is honest with my diagnoses and always gives me multiple treatment options.  He never badgers me but gently reminds me I need to loose weight and offers helpful suggestions.  

I am never made to wait in the office very long; he is prompt and courteous. I appreciate his "bedside manner" and his staff pleasant.  I plan to continue to see him and recommend him to others.55-Barb S in Morgantown, indiana | Sep 03, 2016My husband and I have been patients of Dr. Samuels for close to 10 years.  Being transplants from Ohio, we were worried we couldn't find an Internist that could give us the quality care we had. We were very fortunate to get a recommendation for Dr. Samuels. He is by far, in our opinion, a caring, compassionate, and professional physician. He actually will take the time to listen to your concerns and treat accordingly.  As seniors, this is very important to us. 55-Doug H. in Greenwood, IN | Aug 31, 2016


I have been seeing Dr Samuels for nearly 20 years.  I've not had any problems in scheduling appointments when I've had medical issues. I have recommended him to my friends. He keeps after me regarding my following his orders - for my own good! I would not "have been with him" this long if I did not like like how he has treated me. 55-Gary D Dorris in Franklin,Ind 46131 | Aug 06, 2016 I have been seeing Dr. Samuels for 23 years and have been very pleased with him as a doctor and friend. I would recommend him to anyone  looking for a doctor . he is them most caring doctor I have ever been with.55-Pj Mullineux  in Fishers, IN | Jul 27, 2016You cannot find a better doc. He sincerely cares about his patients; he listens and hears them. His bedside manor is sincere and true.  Putting yourself in his care takes all your worries away. I'm a patient as is my mother and she is nearing the end of her life and Dr. Samuels has gone above and beyond to make sure she is respected, has dignity, and a peaceful existence in her last days. He is the best doc there is and will always be mine. He is an exceptional physician; one of a kind! 55-KathrynDP in Indianapolis, IN | Jul 25, 2016Even though going to the doctor isn't always the most favorite thing to do, I know when I see Dr. Samuels I can trust that he is going to take the time and hear the reason for my visit and he is going to resolve the issue or issues that I am experiencing.  He is hands down one of the best there is out there and I always recommend him to all of my family and friends.   15-X-Patient in Indianapolis, IN | Jul 23, 2016After years of seeing him, he turned his back to me because of my medical condition. ChronicPain. Treating me like a child, his words were, he treats his kids the same way. Told me this is how it's going to be!  You will sit there and Not say a word!  When I tried  to ask a question,  he said. that's it, you're going to pain management. I have always been told by others that I am always smiling, always seem so happy. Sad to say I will never have another good word or smile for Dr. Steven Samuels.55-Charles R. Wilhite  (Rick) in Greenwood, IN | Jul 22, 2016Dr. Samuels has taken care of my wife and I for over 20+ years.  He is an excellent Doctor and has given my wife and I great care. Dr. Samuels is  Patient, Caring and Intelligent and we thank him for all he has done for us when we were young and now into our 70's.  Dr. Samuels and his staff are efficient and they listen and answer our questions and overall give us great care.   Many of our friends and family members have selected Dr. Samuels to care for them. Great Man and Physician he is.   55-Jackie J in Greenwood, IN | Jul 19, 2016I have been a patient of Dr. Samuels for over 10 years.  He is very respectful and genuinely concerned in my care.  When I contact his office, he has always been quick to respond to my health concerns.  I have recommended him to numerous people and received positive feedback from those referrals.  Additionally, I feel extremely confident in the level of care Dr. Samuels provides, it's quite obvious that he is consistently current in standards of care and options in therapies.15Jul 18, 2016This is the worst Dr. I have ever had.  Very unprofessional.  Treat and street them attitude without finding out all the facts.  Assumes things without further investigation.   Would never recommend him to anyone.
His nurse practitioner also reports data incorrectly.55-Ed in Greenwood, IN | Jul 16, 2016My wife and I (both over 70) have been with Dr. Samuels since 2008.  We have been extremely pleased and have recommended him to several of our friends, and at least five have started with him.55Atlanta, GA | Jul 15, 2016 I took my elderly mother in law to Dr. Samuels for years and received excellent care for he before she passed at age 87. I am currently taking my own elderly parents 90 and 92 respectfully for the past several years55-Nan Ralph Reid in Scottsdale, AZ | Jul 12, 2016I have never met Dr Samuels. He treated our mother 15 years ago and was so kind that all of her eight children were grateful that she had him for her final days. I have a brother and a sister who are current patients. My sister is very ill and he has listened to her concerns and made her feel at ease asking the hard questions. Again we are grateful that there are still Dr's like Dr Samuels who listen and  provide the support that is needed in difficult times. Thank you Nan Ralph Reid55-VirginiaAdams in Greenwood, IN | Jul 12, 2016I have been going to Dr Samuels for nearly 20 years. He is always very attentive to my health needs and concerns. 55-Tres Offenhauser in Indianapolis, IN | Jul 11, 2016Very professional, highly recommend for all of his knowledge in the field and bed side care.55-Susan Offenhauser in Indianapolis, IN | Jul 11, 2016Dr. Samuels took the time to explain everything in terms that I could understand. He reviewed my diagnosis along with options thoroughly and did not rush through the appointment. 55Indianapolis, IN | Jul 11, 2016I was looking for a primary physician and was referred to Dr. Samuels by a friend. I have had an excellent experience from routine checkups to a severe sinus infection. He is easy to talk to and able to answer all of my questions. I was able to get an appointment quickly and have never experienced a wait which is very important to me because previous providers I feel I spent more time in the waiting room than with the doctor. I would high recommend Dr. Samuels.55-Bob in Indianapolis, IN | Jul 11, 2016Incredibly responsive and took three necessary time to explain treatment options. Didn't fell hurried in and out. Wonderful experience, and personable, too.55-Heather D. in Indianapolis, IN | Jul 11, 2016Dr. Samuels was referred to me by a colleague several years ago and I'm so thankful he was. He always takes the time to explain my diagnosis with me in detail and in a way that's easy to understand. He follows up to check on me and even took the time to say hello during my most recent exam in the same office to make sure I was feeling better and the medicine was working the way it should. I just referred him to a friend because that's how great he is and comfortable I am with Dr. Samuels. 55-alice in martinsville IN | Jul 11, 2016Dr. Samuels is an excellent doctor who listens and provides the best care possible. He has been my doctor for years. He recommends the appropriate testing and medication for each health issue i have encountered. He is always on top of the latest research. He is timely and respecful and his staff is as well. He was also my mothers doctor and took excellent care of her. I recommend him to all my family and friends. 55-Richard q in Martinsville, IN | Jul 07, 2016I have been going to Dr samuels for over  20  years. I have had many  health issues and Dr samuels has always treated me with respect and kindness. He always  stays up with the latest  and best treatments. He is  extremely knowledgeable and has helped  me live a healthy life and overcome many issues. I am soon going  to celebrate  my 80 th birthday and believe I  wouldn't be  here to celebrate if he wasn't my doctor.  I consider  him a friend as well as my doctor.  I recommend him to everyone.55-Shawn in Greenwood, IN | Jul 06, 2016I've seen Dr. Samuels several times for issue ranging from tennis elbow, cholesterol, colds and viruses.  He is very good in getting to a treatment that fixes the issue and my appointments have been on time and sensitive to my time and schedule needs.55-Ann in Fishers, IN | Jul 04, 2016Dr. Samuels is fantastic! He is always available and really takes the time to listen to your problems. He offers solutions to fit the patients individual needs. 55-Rick  in New Palestine, IN | Jul 02, 2016I have seen Dr. Samuels for over 6 years, He has taken great care of me and is very thorough and orders the appropriate testing. I trust his  knowledge and appreciate  his concern about my health. We now have several other family members seeing Doc and appreciate his patience with them. He has been highly recommended to others55-rex callon in Indianapolis, IN | Jul 01, 2016I am a new patient and have only seen Dr. Samuels a few times, but I would highly recommend him to others.  He has been more than helpful and his staff has been very courteous and kind.  Dr. Samuels is very concerned and listened to my problems and came up with the best solution.55-Alan D in Indianapolis | Jul 01, 2016Dr. Samuels is extremely well trained and keeps up with all the latest research.  He is friendly and extremely approachable.  If I call with a concern, he always responds in a timely manner.  I am so thankful to have him as my primary care physician.15Indianapolis, IN | May 19, 2016He is an arrogant doctor who more often than not does not listen to you when you describe your symptoms.  He is quick to draw the gun so to speak that you have a psychiatric disorder when he cannot find the issue physically. 15-M. Thomas in Indianapolis, IN | May 12, 2016He is arrogant and very rude.  He saw my mom 1 time (no lab work ordered before her appointment) changed her blood pressure medicine and decreased her insulin levels without consulting with her endocrinologist.  The blood pressure medicine he put her on, made her blood pressure to plummet  causing her to pass out, fall and she hit her head and broke her arm when she fell.  She will never go to him again!   15Indianapolis, IN | May 12, 2016Was moved to Dr. Samuels because of condition.  Work required a return to work letter which I was told by Dr. at hospital that would come from Dr. Samuels.  I called for appt. to get letter. Was 10 minutes early for appt. Was told that I was late for appt. 2 minutes after scheduled appt. time and that they would have to reschedule the next time that I was late. When dr. finally came in 20 minutes late he told me that I would need find a new Dr. The letter must have been to much for him to do. More CommentsHave you seen Dr. Steven Samuels, MD?Leave a Review.Are you Dr. Samuels?Make it easy for patients to share their feedback. Also manage your personalized profile!Post your responseCompare Dr. SamuelsCompare this DoctorView other doctors with similar experience to find the right doctor for you.Dr. August Natalie, MDDermatology8325 S Emerson Ave Ste C1Indianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(80)Dr. Nabeel Farooqui, MDAllergy & Immunology5144 E Stop 11 Rd Ste 22Indianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(93)Distance1.4  miles awayDr. Abhinav Singh, MDSleep Medicine701 E County Line Rd Ste 101Greenwood, IN 46143Patient Satisfaction(19)Dr. Peter Turlo, MDHospital Medicine5330 E Stop 11 RdIndianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(15)Distance1.4  miles awayDr. Nadeem Ikhlaque, MDOncology8111 S Emerson AveIndianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(13)Distance1.1  miles awayDr. William Berg, MDInternal Medicine5330 E Stop 11 RdIndianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(9)Distance1.4  miles awayDr. David Pound, MDGastroenterology8051 S Emerson Ave Ste 200Indianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(12)Distance1.1  miles awayDr. Jason Fleming, MDCardiology5330 E Stop 11 RdIndianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(5)Distance1.4  miles awayDr. Robert Kinn, MDInternal Medicine5330 E Stop 11 RdIndianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(6)Distance1.4  miles awayDr. Jason Roberts, MDInternal Medicine8051 S Emerson Ave Ste 200Indianapolis, IN 46237Patient Satisfaction(1)Distance1.1  miles awayView all 10 matchesSee all internal medicine doctors in Greenwood, IN×Dr. Samuels' experience matches your search based on the following criteria: Based on total number of patients treated over the last 12 months Specializes in Internal Medicine Board certified in Internal Medicine Malpractice claims in Indiana not available No sanctions found No board actions found×Awards & RecognitionAwards & HonorsHealthgrades Honor RollWhat is a recognized doctor Healthgrades Recognized Doctor designation identifies leading doctors who:Are board certified.Have not had their license surrendered or revoked since Healthgrades started collecting data in 2000.Have no malpractice judgments, adverse arbitration awards, or monetary settlements for the last five years in the states in which Healthgrades can collect malpractice data.Are free of state or federal disciplinary actions (sanctions) for the last five years.Healthgrades updates the Recognized Doctor list quarterly based on board certification data. Healthgrades also receives sanction and malpractice data throughout the year, depending on how frequently the state medical boards release updates. We remove a newly sanctioned doctor from the Recognized Doctor list as soon as we receive the information. However, it is important to note that malpractice information is publically available in only 14 states.Media & PublicationsDr. Samuels has no media or publications listed.Background Check n/a Malpractice Claims not availableHealthgrades does not collect malpractice information for Indiana.What is medical malpracticeWhat is medical malpractice?Medical malpractice is issued when negligence by a doctor causes injury to a patient. For example, a doctor may improperly diagnose, treat or medicate outside the standard of medical care. The three types of malpractice are: a settlement, an arbitration award, or a judgment.If my doctor has malpractice history, does that mean he or she is a poor-quality doctor?If your doctor has a malpractice claim, evaluate the information and determine if the action could potentially impact the quality of care you receive. Claim settlements and arbitration awards may occur for a variety of reasons, which should not necessarily reflect negatively on the doctor's professional competence or conduct.You may want to use this information to start a discussion with the doctor about his or her history and specific ability to provide healthcare for you.How far back does Healthgrades malpractice history go?Healthgrades reports details of a doctor’s malpractice history when the doctor has at least one closed medical malpractice claim within the last five years, even if he or she no longer practices in that state.For which states does Healthgrades collect malpractice history?Healthgrades collects malpractice information from California, Colorado, Connecticut, Florida, Georgia, Illinois, Massachusetts, Nevada, New Jersey, New York, North Carolina, Oregon, Tennessee, Texas, Vermont, Virginia and West Virginia. If your doctor has a malpractice claim, evaluate the information and determine if the action could potentially impact your quality of care. Sometimes multiple states report the same claim. If a provider practices in a state where data is unavailable, please reach out to your local state legislature to help make this data publicly available.0SanctionsNo sanctions history found for the years that Healthgrades collects data.What is a sanction or disciplinary actionWhat is a sanction or disciplinary action?A sanction, also known as a disciplinary action, is an action taken to punish or restrict a doctor who has demonstrated professional misconduct. Sanctions may be imposed by a state medical board, professional medical licensing organization, or the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.If my doctor has sanction history, does that mean he or she is a poor-quality doctor?If a doctor has a sanction, it does not necessarily mean that he or she is a poor-quality doctor. Some sanctions are not related to medical care, and involve a doctor’s finances or administrative activities. Before you make any choices about changing your doctor, we recommend that you evaluate the doctor’s sanction information and determine how severe or relevant you think the sanction cause and action were.How far back does Healthgrades sanction history go?Healthgrades reports state and federal sanctions from the previous five years, except when a doctor's license has been revoked or surrendered. Healthgrades displays all actions for doctors whose licenses have been revoked or surrendered.For which states does Healthgrades collect sanction history?Healthgrades collects sanction history from all 50 U.S. states. Physicians with a disciplinary action in one state may move to another state where they have a clean record. Since Healthgrades painstakingly compiles disciplinary action information from all 50 states, Healthgrades website will show if a physician has a disciplinary action in more than one state.0Board ActionsNo board actions found for the years that Healthgrades collects data.What are board actionsWhat are board actions?Board actions are non-disciplinary actions imposed upon a doctor based on a complaint investigation. A patient or medical colleague may file a complaint with that state medical board or professional licensing organization, which then investigates the complaint. Board actions are intended to ensure that a doctor is able to perform safe medical and health care tasks.Types of non-disciplinary actions include an advisory letter, a corrective action agreement, a limitation or restriction on the medical or healthcare tasks a doctor can perform, or a voluntary agreement by the doctor not to practice. A board action can also include a termination of a corrective action agreement or voluntary agreement, which allows the doctor to return to full practice.If my doctor has a board action, does that mean he or she is a poor-quality doctor?If a doctor has a board action, it means he or she has had a non-disciplinary action imposed upon him or her. It does not necessarily mean that he or she is a poor quality doctor. Before you make any choices about changing your doctor, evaluate the doctor's board action information and determine how severe or relevant you think the cause and action were.How far back does Healthgrades non-disciplinary board action history go?Healthgrades reports non-disciplinary board action history from for the previous five years, except when a doctor's license has been revoked or surrendered. Healthgrades displays all actions for doctors whose licenses have been revoked or surrendered.For which states does Healthgrades collect non-disciplinary board actions?Healthgrades collects non-disciplinary board actions from all 50 U.S. states.Board CertificationsWhy It Matters: Dr. Samuels' Board CertificationsBoard certification should be one of your top considerations when choosing a doctor. Board certification is an official recognition given to doctors who have met specific requirements set by national medical specialty boards in the... More Why It Matters: Dr. Samuels' Board CertificationsBoard certification should be one of your top considerations when choosing a doctor. Board certification is an official recognition given to doctors who have met specific requirements set by national medical specialty boards in the United States.Board certification indicates that a doctor is highly qualified in the medical field in which he or she practices. A board-certified doctor is more likely than a non-board-certified doctor to have the most current skills and knowledge about how to treat your medical condition.Dr. Samuels is Board Certified in:Internal MedicineAccrediting Board: American Board of Internal Medicine ** This information is proprietary data maintained in a copyrighted database compilation owned by the American Board of Medical Specialties. Copyright 2017 American Board of Medical Specialties. All rights reserved.Less Internal MedicineConditions TreatedDr. Samuels does not have any conditions listed. If you are Dr. Samuels and would like to add conditions you treat, please update your free profile.EducationMedical SchoolIndiana University School Of MedicineGraduated in 1988Internship HospitalIndiana University School Of MedCompleted in 1989Residency HospitalIndiana University School Of MedCompleted in 1991Languages SpokenEnglishSpanishMemberships & Professional AffiliationsDr. Samuels does not have any memberships or affiliations listed. If you are Dr. Samuels and would like to add memberships or affiliations, please update your free profile.SpecialtiesInternal MedicineProcedures PerformedDr. Samuels does not have any procedures listed. If you are Dr. Samuels and would like to add procedures you perform, please update your free profile.






















 




 
 








Steven Samuels at Nassau Community College - RateMyProfessors.com


































Professors








Schools








Rate








Blog








My Profs










log In

































Professors

View All Professors


Schools

View All Schools



               Sorry No Results Found
             

















Follow us





facebook




twitter




tumblr




pinterest




instagram










Professors

View All Professors


Schools

View All Schools



          Sorry No Results Found
        


















Log In
 Log In / Sign Up 











Find a Professor


Find a Professor

SEARCH BY
Name
School






I'm looking for a professor at








named





This field is required.




cancel








I'm looking for professors at





This field is required.

in the


select


 department.


cancel









Find a School


Find a School
Find your school

SEARCH BY
Name
Location










This field is required.


          Looking for a professor by school/department?
          Click here.




CANCEL

            Looking for a professor by school/department?
            Click here.










I'm looking for a school in 


select state
Alaska
Alabama
Arkansas
Arizona
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Washington DC
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Iowa
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Massachusetts
Maryland
Maine
Michigan
Minnesota
Missouri
Mississippi
Montana
North Carolina
North Dakota
Nebraska
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
Nevada
New York
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Virginia
Vermont
Washington
Wisconsin
West Virginia
Wyoming


This field is required.


        Looking for a professor by school/department?
        Click here.



CANCEL








Rate a

Rate a

Professor
School






        I want to rate 

This field is required.






 
cancel







        I want to rate 

This field is required.






 
cancel








Rate My Professors Blog





All Categories
RMP Buzz
Video
Top Lists
Miscellaneous
















×
Saved Professors







Load More

























 Steven   
             Samuels
           



           Professor in the Communication department
           
at Nassau Community College, Garden City, NY


               Campus Video Tour
             



are you Steven?




Rate This Professor

             Share
             






Submit a Correction
| Learn how ratings work

















                 Overall Quality
                 2.7





               Would Take Again
               
                 N/A
               


               Level of Difficulty
               
                 3.5
               


               Hotness
               









Top 20 Tags for this Professor
See how other students describe this professor.

 Tough Grader (6)
 LOTS OF HOMEWORK (5)
 Skip class? You won't pass. (3)
 Inspirational (1)
 Gives good feedback (1)

Choose your tags




       39 Student Ratings
     

       
         0 Professor Notes
       
     





350 characters left














Rating: All




All Ratings



Good



Average



Poor





Class




All Classes


COM107


FILMPRODUCTION


COM


COM110


COM113


TVJOURNALISM


FILM


DOCMEDTVJOUR


DOCMEDIA


COM210


COM207


COM109


TVJOUSECT





Comment





 05/03/2017



awful




1.0
Overall Quality




1.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: Yes
Attendance: Mandatory
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: No
Grade Received: B



LOTS OF HOMEWORK
TOUGH GRADER


                  HORRIBLE. HORRIBLE. HORRIBLE. Although I got a B this was the hardest class i have ever taken in my life.
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 03/23/2017



awful




1.0
Overall Quality




4.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: Yes
Attendance: Mandatory
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: No
Grade Received: WD



LOTS OF HOMEWORK
SKIP CLASS? YOU WON'T PASS.


                  AVOID AT ALL COSTS PLEASE. This guy is the absolute worst teacher I've had at Nassau. he thinks everyone is there to be film majors when nobody is. I needed it for my media communications major and it was the worst class ever. he doesn't let you make up hw or tests. I missed a test and said he couldn't nothing about it. HE SUCKS and should be fired
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 12/28/2016



awful




1.0
Overall Quality




5.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM109
For Credit: Yes
Attendance: Mandatory
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: No
Grade Received: N/A



SKIP CLASS? YOU WON'T PASS.
TOUGH GRADER
LOTS OF HOMEWORK


                  If you're looking for a professor who makes you feel horrible about yourself, this is the professor that does.  He doesn't accept homeworks if you're absent and picks on everything you do. He said many were doing good but then gives them C's. This is the class that will mess up your GPA.  Do not take his class!
               


                       1
                    person
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating














 05/16/2016



good




4.0
Overall Quality




3.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM109
For Credit: Yes
Attendance: Mandatory
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: B



INSPIRATIONAL
TOUGH GRADER
GIVES GOOD FEEDBACK


                  Samuels was a cool guy. Definitly the shmoozer type, Samuels has the ability to deter some people away. If you want to have a future in TV/Radio, Samuels is the guy to know at NCC. Take his class!
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       10
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 04/11/2015



awful




1.0
Overall Quality




5.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM113
For Credit: Yes
Attendance: Mandatory
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: WD



TOUGH GRADER
LOTS OF HOMEWORK
SKIP CLASS? YOU WON'T PASS.


                  350 characters isn't enough to describe professor Samuels. He is disgustingly unreasonable. If you miss one class, you miss 2 homeworks. He accepts nothing late (even if you email him on the day it's due). He will not give you homework that you missed. HE'S BEYOND obnoxious. You don't learn anything about Doc Media. Expect homework every night.
               


                       7
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       1
                    person
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 01/21/2015



poor




1.5
Overall Quality




4.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: Yes
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A



LOTS OF HOMEWORK
TOUGH GRADER


                  Absolutely horrible professor.  So confusing, grading system makes no sense.  Expects a paper every night for homework even if there's like 8 questions.  I'm a communications major and I only received a C I hated his class and reported him to the head of the department.  AVOID AT ALL COSTS
               


                       8
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       1
                    person
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 09/16/2014



poor




2.0
Overall Quality




4.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: Yes
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A



TOUGH GRADER


                  Horribly tough grader.  Expects essays for hw.  Hw every single night and if you''re absent you''re screwed.  One of the worst I have ever had  I am a communications major and he really screwed my GPA
               


                       5
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       1
                    person
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 05/12/2014



awful




1.0
Overall Quality




5.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM110
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: Mandatory
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  Class was so boring and he gives 6 page homework avoid!!!!!
               


                       5
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating














 12/20/2013



average




3.0
Overall Quality




3.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM109
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  He gives HW every night and doesn't except make ups so if you're absent you're screwed. That can be very annoying but his tv journalism class was other wise fine. You learn a lot about the business and you even record a newscast in a studio. I'd give his class a C+
               


                       2
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       1
                    person
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 01/24/2012



awesome




4.5
Overall Quality




3.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM210
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  I'm really shocked at the low ratings Samuel's have. He is an amazing teacher. If you do his work, you can pass with an A. I didn't do all I had to do so I didn't do as well in the class. He's not boring to listen to and my class with him was 3 hours long. I learned a lot. I would take one of his classes again!
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       3
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 12/20/2011



good




4.0
Overall Quality




3.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  I don't know why everyone is so hard on him. If you do your work and you're interested in film at all, then you'll get something out of the class. He's a tough grader but you do learn. I enjoyed his sense of humor and laidback lectures. I find him extremely knowledgeable and helpful (I had him for more than one class too).
               


                       1
                    person
                     found this useful 

                       4
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 10/13/2011



good




4.0
Overall Quality




4.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  I took his class despite reading bad reviews. He gives a lot of work. But if you do it and come to class, then you should not have problems. He is a nice guy, class is interesting. I think he's a very good teacher--very thorough and intelligent (and his humor is amusing in its own way). Take the class and just be ready to get things moving (:
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       2
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 09/24/2011



awesome




5.0
Overall Quality




2.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  He is an amazing instructor but if you are looking for a free ride...find another class.  You will work hard and he's worth it.  I highly recommend taking his class if you want to learn.
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       2
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating














 05/23/2011



awful




1.0
Overall Quality




5.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  One of the worst professors in NCC, he is so unclear with his lectures, his teaching format is horrible, he is not structured,and he grades REDICULOUSLY hard on the hw as if we're all going to become film artists, and his voice is irritating and makes a student falls asleep. AVOID AVOID AVOID
               


                       4
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 05/14/2010



average




2.5
Overall Quality




2.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  AVOID! was taking this class as elective and he is crazy with attendence and hw EVERY night that has nothing to do with class work, boring, and it started with a full class i got pushed into late and ended up with 9 of us
               


                       2
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 01/20/2010



awesome




5.0
Overall Quality




2.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  He really is a good professor, he knows a lot about the film industry. The class is very interesting and teaches you a lot, don't take it if you just want to do it for fun, take it if this is the kind of career you want to pursue later on. Make sure to do all the homeworks that are assigned or you are risking to fail, homeworks count a lot.
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       1
                    person
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 01/08/2009



good




4.0
Overall Quality




5.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM113
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  i love this professor,but hes for serious students only.he really takes an interest in you if you put A LOT of effort into the homeworks.it also helps if you care and have a brain.heres the trick to getting 4 checks on the media briefings:ALWAYS quote the article and dont write 3 sentence answers.dont miss class because you cant make up the hw
               


                       1
                    person
                     found this useful 

                       1
                    person
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 07/30/2008



average




3.0
Overall Quality




2.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM110
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  DcmntaryIN the beginning it was pretty hard to keep up with the homeworks but later on I found out the trick. This is the trick.  Look at the questions and answer them directly from the articles. Dont add your feedbacks or thoughts. Thats what he wants. And you will get at least B. Dont miss any lectures. He is boring and his voice is killing me..
               


                       1
                    person
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating














 01/01/2008



awesome




4.5
Overall Quality




3.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: Yes
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  Very Nice gentleman.. If you show interest, he will help you a lot and be easy on you! Go to class, attendance is a must!
               


                       0
                    people
                     found this useful 

                       1
                    person
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






 10/15/2007



poor




2.0
Overall Quality




4.0
Level of Difficulty






 COM107
For Credit: N/A
Attendance: N/A
Textbook Used: No
Would Take Again: N/A
Grade Received: N/A





                  Can you write at least 2 pages hw for each class. You have to. 60 percent of homework. I hate.. I hate..
               


                       1
                    person
                     found this useful 

                       0
                    people
                     did not find this useful


report this rating






           Load More
         

No ratings found – view all ratings for this professor.

 

Were these reviews helpful? Help out your fellow students.
Rate this professor



More Professors from this school








Add your notes






Class



This field is required.



Comment


350 characters left

This field is required.



                 By clicking the 'Submit' button, I acknowledge that I have read and agreed to the Rate My Professors
                 Site Guidelines,
                 Terms of Use and
                 Privacy Policy.
                 Submitted data becomes the property of RateMyProfessors.com. IP addresses are logged.
               








date
Class
Note













         Showing professors at
       

Nassau Community College Edit


         in
         
Enter Your Department
Accounting
Administrative Support
African-American Studies
Allied Health
Anthropology
Art
Biology
Business
Business Analysis
Chemistry
Child & Youth
Communication
Criminal Justice
Dance
Design
Early Childhood Education
Economics
Electronics Technology
Engineering
Engineering & Physics
English
Fashion
Finance
Fine Arts
Foreign Languages
Freshman Seminar
General Studies
Geography
Geology
Health Sciences
History
Hotel & Restaurant Management
Information Technology
Interdisciplinary Studies
Interior Design
International Studies
Judaic Studies
Legal Studies
Library Science
Literature
Logistics
Management
Marketing
Math & Computer Science
Mathematics
Medical Terminology
Mortuary Science
Multidisciplinary Studies
Music
Nursing
Office Technology
Philosophy
Photography
Physical Education
Physical Sciences
Physics
Political Science
Psychology
Reading
Retail
Security & Crime Prevention
Social Science
Social Work
Sociology
Student Services
Studio Art
Telecommunications
Theater
Women's Studies





0 professors found
    

Most Rated
Highest Rated
Least Difficult
Alphabetical






a
b
c
d
e
f
g
h
i
j
k
l
m
n
o
p
q
r
s
t
u
v
w
x
y
z
All





Load More




  don't see your professor? add them.












Tag your professor
Select up to 3 tags that best describe your professor.

Tough Grader
Gives good feedback
Respected
Get ready to read
Participation matters
Skip class? You won't pass.
LOTS OF HOMEWORK
Inspirational
BEWARE OF POP QUIZZES
ACCESSIBLE OUTSIDE CLASS
SO MANY PAPERS
Clear grading criteria
Hilarious
TEST HEAVY
GRADED BY FEW THINGS
Amazing lectures
Caring
EXTRA CREDIT
GROUP PROJECTS
LECTURE HEAVY




×

























×


Note Submitted
Thank you for submitting your note.
Close
×


We see that you’re using AdBlock.
Ads can be annoying, but they allow us to provide you this resource for free. If you use an ad blocker, we're not getting that revenue that helps keep RateMyProfessors.com up and running.
Please whitelist us. Thanks!
×


Choosing the right professor isn't easy!

		Help guide your fellow classmates by giving them the inside scoop! They'll do the same for you.
		Hope you had a good semester.We're all counting on you.
	
Remind Me Later
Rate Now
×



Your Note Has Been Deleted

Close



Delete Note?
Are you sure you want to delete this note? Once deleted, we can't bring it back.

Yes
No


×





◀
×



Wild 'N Out Returns
Wednesday Jan 7 @ 11pm only on MTV2!


0

    get more info about the premiere
    





















































Steve Samuels - IMDb













































































 










 
IMDb




More





All
Titles
TV Episodes
Names
Companies
Keywords
Characters
Quotes
Bios
Plots










Movies,
                TV
                & Showtimes




MOVIES

In Theaters
Showtimes & Tickets
Latest Trailers
Coming Soon
Release Calendar
Top Rated Movies
Top Rated Indian Movies
Most Popular Movies

CHARTS & TRENDS

Box Office
Oscar Winners
Most Popular by Genre



TV & VIDEO

IMDb TV
On Tonight
Top Rated TV Shows
Most Popular TV Shows
Watch Now on Amazon
DVD & Blu-Ray

SPECIAL FEATURES

Amazon Originals
Streaming
Comic-Con
IMDb Picks
Superheroes







Celebs,
                Events
                & Photos




CELEBS

Born Today
Celebrity News
Most Popular Celebs

PHOTOS

Latest Stills
Latest Posters
Photos We Love



EVENTS

Awards Central
Oscars
Golden Globes
Sundance
Cannes
Comic-Con
Emmy Awards
Venice Film Festival
Toronto Film Festival
Festival Central
Tribeca
All Events







News &
Community





LATEST HEADLINES


 Box Office: ‘Atomic Blonde’ Explodes With $1.5 Million, Topping ‘Emoji Movie,’ on Thursday

3 hours ago


 Priyanka Chopra Developing Comedy Series About Bollywood Star at ABC (Exclusive)

2 hours ago


 Leonard Landy, ‘Our Gang’ Actor, Dies at 84

19 hours ago





NEWS

Top News
Movie News
TV News
Celebrity News
Indie News

COMMUNITY

Contributor Zone
Polls







Watchlist




            YOUR WATCHLIST
    













 
 


 



The leading information resource for the entertainment industry
Find industry contacts & talent representation
Manage your photos, credits, & more
Showcase yourself on IMDb & Amazon
Go to IMDbPro


|

Help


 

 

 










Sign in with Facebook
Other Sign in options










 








 


















 




STARmeter
SEE RANK


Up
7,148
this week


View rank on IMDbPro
»



 Steve Samuels
(I)


 
Producer




            Contribute to IMDb. Add a bio, trivia, and more.
Update information for Steve Samuels »










14 news articles »                















 


ad feedback








Feedback: Please take 5 minutes to participate in our short IMDb survey     




Quick Links

 


Biography




Awards




Photo Gallery




 


Filmography (by Job)




Trailers and Videos







Filmography



by Year




by Job




by Ratings




by Votes




by Genre




by Keyword



Personal Details



Biography




Other Works




Publicity Listings




Official Sites




Contact Info (IMDbPro)



Did You Know?



Personal Quotes




Trivia 




Trademark



Photo & Video



Photo Gallery




Trailers and Videos



Opinion



Awards



Related Items



Credited With




NewsDesk




External Sites



Professional Services



Promote yourself with a resume




Add or change photos




Get more at IMDbPro





Explore More
Show Less






   Chris Hardwick Breaks Down the 'Justice League' Panel                         Chris Hardwick regales Kevin Smith with tales of the eventful Justice League panel. This and more in our Guide to Comic-Con. Watch the video 






Share this page:
















   Who Wore It Best at Comic-Con?                       Check out some of our favorite Comic-Con cosplayers, who in some cases looked every bit as good as their inspirations. Compare cosplayers with their inspirations 






 






Related News


Berlin: FilmNation Continues to Refine Business Model Without Being Trendy



                                  5 February 2015 10:00 AM, -08:00
                                
|
Variety - Film News





Meryl Streep Set For ‘The Good House’ With De Niro & ‘The Giver’ Opposite Bridges



                                  7 August 2013 12:15 AM, -08:00
                                
|
The Hollywood News





Robert de Niro and Meryl Streep Join The Good House



                                  6 August 2013 6:17 PM, -08:00
                                
|
MovieWeb




See all 14 related articles »
            









  Around The Web  |  Powered by ZergNet        






On Amazon Video



Watch Now


 Running with Scissors
 



Watch Now


 House at the End of the Street
 



Watch Now


 Half Light
 



Watch Now


 Michael Clayton
 



Watch Now


 In the Valley of Elah
 



See more on Amazon Video »
                










Do you have a demo reel?
Add it to your IMDbPage









Find out more at IMDb Pro »
        






Connect with IMDb









How Much Have You Seen?
How much of Steve Samuels's work have you seen?





User Polls


 Tilda Swinton's Roles

 Morality Plays

 Face-Off: Lawyers Exposing Corruption In Their Law-Firms

 Standout Leading Man

 Non-Chronological Movies

 Clooney Types

See more polls »







 








Known For


 
 
Michael Clayton
Producer

(2007)


 
 
In the Valley of Elah
Producer

(2007)


 
 
House at the End of the Street
Producer

(2012)


 
 
Running with Scissors
Producer

(2006)











 Show all


 Hide all

 | 


Show by...
Job
Year »
Rating »
Number of Ratings »
Genre »
Keyword »


 | 
 Edit
 
Filmography


Hide 
Show 
Producer (5 credits)




 2012

House at the End of the Street
(executive producer)




 2007

In the Valley of Elah
(producer - as Steven Samuels)




 2007

Michael Clayton
(producer - as Steven Samuels)




 2006

Running with Scissors
(executive producer - as Steven Samuels)




 2006

Half Light
(producer)



 







 Edit
 
Personal Details

Alternate Names:
            Steven Samuels
        







Getting Started
|
Contributor Zone »
Contribute to This Page




Edit page



Add resume








   Get Caught Up on Comic-Con    Catch up with everything you missed at Comic-Con with IMDb's 2017 Comic-Con Guide.                  Black Panther Cast Members on Becoming Their Characters                   Chris Hemsworth and Taika Waititi Are Excited About Thor: Ragnarok           Browse Our Guide to Comic-Con 










 





 






IMDb Everywhere

 

 

 


Find showtimes, watch trailers, browse photos, track your Watchlist and rate your favorite movies and TV shows on your phone or tablet!
IMDb Mobile site




      Follow IMDb on
      
 

 

 









Home
Top Rated Movies
Box Office
TV
Coming Soon
Site Index
Search
In Theaters




Contact Us
 Register

News

Press Room
Advertising
Jobs




IMDbPro
 Box Office Mojo

 Withoutabox


Conditions of Use
Privacy Policy
 Interest-Based Ads










Copyright © 1990-2017
                IMDb.com, Inc.


                An Amazon.com company.
            




                Amazon Affiliates
            





Amazon Video
Watch Movies &TV Online






Prime Video
Unlimited Streamingof Movies & TV






Amazon Germany
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon Italy
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon France
Buy Movies onDVD & Blu-ray






Amazon India
Buy Movie andTV Show DVDs






DPReview
DigitalPhotography






Audible
DownloadAudio Books






























